Hawaii, session 2026, SB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321-    Lead poisoning; lead screening tests; minors; exemption.  (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a physician treating a minor patient shall: (1)  Perform a lead screening test on the minor patient or order a lead screening test for the minor patient at certain intervals using methods pursuant to recommendations adopted by the department of health; and (2)  Make an entry of the lead screening test on the minor patient's record. (b)  The department of health shall adopt recommendations to implement this section. The recommendations shall include but not be limited to: (1)  Subject to subsection (c), a recommendation that a minor residing in the State shall be considered at high risk for lead exposure and tested according to the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment program schedules for children enrolled in medicaid; and (2)  Procedures for entering the lead screening test information described in subsection (a)(2) on the minor patient's record, including but not limited to procedures for entering the information if testing is performed by a person other than a physician. (c)  The department of health may adjust the recommendation in subsection (b)(1) if, after collecting and reviewing data on lead poisoning in the State for five years, the department of health determines that testing minors at the ages set by the schedules pursuant to subsection (b)(1) is no longer necessary or appropriate to maintain the health and safety of minors who reside in the State.  If the department of health adjusts the recommendations in subsection (b)(1) pursuant to this section, the department of health shall submit a report of its findings and rationale to the legislature forty days prior to the convening of the next regular session." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________